Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 3. Alaska Wage and Hour Act.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska wages and hours, see 8 AAC 15.

Sec. 23.10.050.
Public policy.

It is the public policy of the state to

establish minimum wage and overtime compensation standards for workers at levels consistent with their health, efficiency, and general well-being, and

safeguard existing minimum wage and overtime compensation standards that are adequate to maintain the health, efficiency, and general well-being of workers against the unfair competition of wage and hour standards that do not provide adequate standards of living.

History.

(§ 1 ch 171 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.10.055.
Exemptions; compensation of executives, administrators, and professionals.

The provisions of AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

do not apply to

an individual employed in agriculture, which includes farming in all its branches and, among other things, includes the cultivation and tillage of the soil, dairying, the production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of any agricultural or horticultural commodities, the raising of livestock, bees, fur-bearing animals, or poultry, and any practices, including forestry and lumbering operations, performed by a farmer or on a farm as an incident to or in conjunction with the farming operations, including preparation for market, or delivery to storage or to market or to carriers for transportation to market;

an individual employed in the catching, trapping, cultivating, farming, netting, or taking of any kind of fish, shellfish, or other aquatic forms of animal and vegetable life;

an individual employed in the handpicking of shrimp;

an individual employed in domestic service, including a babysitter, in or about a private home;

an individual employed by the United States or by the state or a political subdivision of the state, except as provided in AS

23.10.065(b)

, including prisoners not on furlough detained or confined in prison facilities;

an individual engaged in the nonprofit activities of a nonprofit religious, charitable, cemetery, or educational organization or other nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does not, in fact, exist, and where services rendered to the organization are on a voluntary basis and are related only to the organization’s nonprofit activities; in this paragraph, “nonprofit activities” means activities for which the nonprofit organization does not incur a liability for unrelated business income tax under 26 U.S.C. 513, as amended;

an employee engaged in the delivery of newspapers to the consumer;

an individual employed solely as a watchman or caretaker of a plant or property that is not in productive use for a period of four months or more;

an individual employed

in a bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity;

in the capacity of an outside salesman or a salesman who is employed on a straight commission basis; or

as a computer systems analyst, computer programmer, software engineer, or other similarly skilled worker;

an individual employed in the search for placer or hard rock minerals;

an individual under 18 years of age employed on a part-time basis not more than 30 hours in a week;

employment by a nonprofit educational or child care facility to serve as a parent of children while the children are in residence at the facility if the employment requires residence at the facility and is compensated on a cash basis exclusive of room and board at an annual rate of not less than

$10,000 for an unmarried person; or

$15,000 for a married couple;

an individual who drives a taxicab, who is compensated for taxicab services exclusively by customers of the service, and whose written contractual arrangements with owners of taxicab vehicles, taxicab permits, or radio dispatch services are based on flat contractual rates and not based on a percentage share of the individual’s receipts from customers, and whose written contract with owners of taxicab vehicles, taxicab permits, or radio dispatch services specifically provides that the contract places no restrictions on hours worked by the individual or on areas in which the individual may work except to comply with local ordinances;

a person who holds a license under AS 08.54 and who is employed by a registered guide-outfitter or master guide-outfitter licensed under AS 08.54, for the first 60 workdays in which the person is employed by the registered guide-outfitter or master guide-outfitter during a calendar year;

an individual engaged in activities for a nonprofit religious, charitable, civic, cemetery, recreational, or educational organization where the employer-employee relationship does not, in fact, exist, and where services are rendered to the organization under a work activity requirement of AS 47.27 (Alaska temporary assistance program);

an individual who

provides emergency medical services only on a voluntary basis;

serves with a full-time fire department only on a voluntary basis; or

provides ski patrol services on a voluntary basis;

a student participating in a University of Alaska practicum described under AS

14.40.065

;

an individual who is employed by a motor vehicle dealer and whose primary duty is to

receive, analyze, or reference requests for service, repair, or analysis of motor vehicles;

arrange financing for the sale of motor vehicles and related products and services that are added or included as part of the sale; or

solicit, sell, lease, or exchange motor vehicles.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, an individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity shall be compensated on a salary or fee basis at a rate of not less than two times the state minimum wage for the first 40 hours of employment each week, exclusive of board or lodging that is furnished by the individual’s employer.

In (a)(9) of this section,

“bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity” has the meaning and shall be interpreted in accordance with 29 U.S.C. 201 — 219 (Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938), as amended, or the regulations adopted under those sections;

“computer systems analyst, computer programmer, software engineer, or other similarly skilled worker” has the meaning and shall be interpreted in accordance with 29 U.S.C. 201 — 219 (Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938), as amended, or the regulations adopted under those sections;

“outside salesman” means an employee

who is customarily and regularly away from the employer’s place of business; and

whose primary duty is making sales or contracts for sales, consignments, or shipments, or obtaining orders for services or for use of facilities for which consideration will be paid by the client or customer;

“salesman who is employed on a straight commission basis” means an employee

who is customarily and regularly employed on the business premises of the employer;

who is compensated on a straight commission basis for the purpose of making sales or contracts for sales, consignments, shipments, or obtaining orders for services or the use of facilities for which a consideration will be paid by the client or customer; and

whose primary duty is making sales or contracts for sales, consignments, shipments, or obtaining orders for service or the use of facilities for which a consideration will be paid by the client or customer.

In (a)(18) of this section,

“lease” means a contract by which a person owning a motor vehicle grants to another person the right to possess, use, and enjoy the motor vehicle for a specified period of time in exchange for periodic payment of a stipulated price and in which the use of the vehicle is granted for a period of at least 12 months;

“motor vehicle” has the meaning given in AS

45.25.990

;

“motor vehicle dealer” has the meaning given in AS

08.66.350

, except that, in this paragraph, notwithstanding the definition of “motor vehicle dealer” given in AS

08.66.350

, “motor vehicle” has the meaning given in this section.

History.

(§ 2(1) ch 171 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 124 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 1993; am § 10 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1997; am §§ 1, 2 ch 19 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 2004; am § 39 ch 84 SLA 2005; am §§ 1, 2 ch 90 SLA 2005; am §§ 1, 2 ch 11 SLA 2014; am § 76 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraph (15) was enacted as (14). Renumbered in 1996.

Administrative Code. —

For exemptions, see 8 AAC 15, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective April 23, 2014, added (a)(18) and (d), and made a related change.

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a)(2), deleted “or” following “cultivating”, made stylistic changes in (a)(3), (4), and (13), in (a)(5), substituted “in this paragraph” for “for purposes of this paragraph” following “nonprofit activities;”.

Sec. 23.10.060.
Payment for overtime.

An employer who employs employees engaged in commerce or other business, or in the production of goods or materials in the state, may not employ an employee for a workweek longer than 40 hours or for more than eight hours a day.

If an employer finds it necessary to employ an employee for hours in excess of the limits set in this subsection, overtime compensation for the overtime at the rate of one and one-half times the regular rate of pay shall be paid. An employee is entitled to overtime compensation for hours worked in excess of eight hours a day. An employee is also entitled to overtime compensation for hours worked in excess of 40 hours a week; in determining whether an employee has worked more than 40 hours a week, the number of hours worked shall be determined without including hours that are worked in excess of eight hours in a day because the employee has or will be separately awarded overtime compensation based on those hours.

This section is considered included in all contracts of employment.

This section does not apply to

an employee employed by an employer employing fewer than four employees in the regular course of business, as “regular course of business” is defined by regulations of the commissioner;

an employee employed in handling, packing, storing, pasteurizing, drying, preparing in their raw or natural state, or canning agricultural or horticultural commodities for market, or in making cheese or butter or other dairy products;

an employee of an employer engaged in small mining operations where not more than 12 employees are employed if the employee is employed not in excess of 12 hours a day or 56 hours a week during a period or periods of not more than 14 workweeks in the aggregate in a calendar year during the mining season, as the season is defined by the commissioner;

an employee engaged in agriculture;

an employee employed in connection with the publication of a weekly, semiweekly, or daily newspaper with a circulation of less than 1,000;

a switchboard operator employed in a public telephone exchange that has fewer than 750 stations;

an employee in an otherwise exempted employment or proprietor in a retail or service establishment engaged in handling telephone or radio messages for the public under an agency or contract arrangement with a communications company where the communications revenue of the agency does not exceed $500 a month;

an employee employed as a seaman;

an employee employed in planting or tending trees, cruising, or surveying, or bucking, or felling timber, or in preparing or transporting logs or other forestry products to the mill, processing plant, railroad, or other transportation terminal if the number of employees employed by the employer in the forestry or lumbering operations does not exceed 12;

an individual employed as an outside buyer of poultry, eggs, cream, or milk in their raw or natural state;

casual employees as may be liberally defined by regulations of the commissioner;

an employee of a hospital whose employment includes the provision of medical services;

work performed by an employee under a flexible work hour plan if the plan is included as part of a collective bargaining agreement;

work performed by an employee under a voluntary flexible work hour plan if

the employee and the employer have signed a written agreement and the written agreement has been filed with the department; and

the department has issued a certificate approving the plan that states the work is for 40 hours a week and not more than 10 hours a day; for work over 40 hours a week or 10 hours a day under a flexible work hour plan not included as part of a collective bargaining agreement, compensation at the rate of one and one-half times the regular rate of pay shall be paid for the overtime;

an individual employed as a line haul truck driver for a trip that exceeds 100 road miles one way if the compensation system under which the truck driver is paid includes overtime pay for work in excess of 40 hours a week or for more than eight hours a day and the compensation system requires a rate of pay comparable to the rate of pay required by this section;

an individual employed as a community health aide by a local or regional health organization as those terms are defined in AS

18.28.100

;

work performed by a mechanic primarily engaged in the servicing of automobiles, light trucks, and motor homes if the mechanic

is employed as a flat-rate mechanic by a nonmanufacturing establishment primarily engaged in the business of selling or servicing motor vehicles;

has signed a written agreement with the employer that specifies the mechanic’s flat hourly rate of pay and the automotive manual or manuals on which the flat rate is to be based;

is compensated for all hours worked in any capacity for that employer up to and including eight hours a day and 40 hours a week at an hourly rate that is not less than the greater of

75 percent of the flat hourly rate of pay agreed on by the employer and employee under (B) of this paragraph; or

twice the state minimum wage; and

is compensated for all hours worked in any capacity for that employer in excess of eight hours a day or 40 hours a week at one and one-half times the rate described in (C) of this paragraph;

work performed by an employee under a voluntary written agreement addressing the trading of work shifts among employees if

the employee is employed by an air carrier subject to subchapter II of the Railway Labor Act (45 U.S.C. 181-188), including employment as a customer service representative;

the trading agreement is not a flexible work hour plan entered into under (13) or (14) of this subsection;

the trading agreement is filed with the employee’s employer; and

the trading agreement states that the employee is not entitled to receive overtime for any hours worked by the employee when the employee voluntarily works those hours under a shift trading practice under which the employee has the opportunity, in the same or other work weeks, to reduce hours worked by voluntarily offering a shift for trade or reassignment;

work performed by a flight crew member employed by an air carrier subject to 45 U.S.C. 181 — 188 (subchapter II of the Railway Labor Act); in this paragraph, “flight crew” means the pilot, co-pilot, flight engineer, and flight attendants.

The minimum amount due an employee under (d)(17)(C) and (D) of this section shall be figured on a weekly basis.

History.

(§ 3 ch 171 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 243 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1972; am § 33 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 47 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 160 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 13 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 123 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 43 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 90 SLA 2005; am § 77 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

The paragraphs of (d) of this section were renumbered in 1990 and 1996 to reflect the deletion of repealed paragraphs.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings concerning the amendment of subsection (b) by § 2, ch. 43, SLA 1999, see § 1, ch. 43, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

For provisions directing that the amendment of (b) of this section made by sec. 2,
ch. 43, SLA 1999, applies to all claims for overtime based on employment on and after July 1, 1990, and before June 2, 1999, and declaring that this application “applies retrospectively to all pending administrative and judicial actions under [that subsection] that are based on the calculation of overtime for employment [between those dates] and that are not resolved by final court judgment or administrative decision on July 3, 2003,” see §§ 1 and 2,
ch. 133, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provisions directing that the enactment of (d)(19) of this section by sec. 1, ch. 11, SLA 2003, applies to employment performed on and after January 1, 2000, and declaring that this application “applies retrospectively to actions and proceedings under [(b) of this section] that are based on a claim for overtime compensation for employment as a flight crew member on or after January 1, 2000, and that are not determined by final court judgment or administrative decision on or before May 18, 2005,” see secs. 1 and 2, ch. 19, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts. For Superior Court case holding that ch. 19, SLA 2005 was unconstitutional, see Pearson v. Cape Smythe Air Service, Inc., 3AN-04-06493CI (Nov. 7, 2005; Superior Ct., 3rd Jud. Dist. at Anchorage.)

Administrative Code. —

For minimum wages and overtime, see 8 AAC 15, art. 2.

For exemptions, see 8 AAC 15, art. 3.

For reduction of wages, see 8 AAC 15, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (d)(7), deleted “telegraphic,” following “handling” and “telegraphic message or” following “where the”, and made stylistic changes in (d)(1) and (17).

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. §§ 201-219 does not expressly preempt AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

on the question of whether airline employees are excluded from the mandatory overtime directive of this section.
April 15, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.

In the case of pilots, flight crews, and other interstate air carrier employees whose activities are directly and substantially related to the transportation activities of the carrier, and who are covered by a valid existing collective bargaining agreement or agreements with the carrier, the state is precluded from applying its overtime laws due to the preemptive nature of the Railway Labor Act, 45 U.S.C. §§ 151-188.
April 15, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.

In instances where no collective bargaining agreements apply, crews of interstate air carriers are nonetheless beyond the jurisdiction of state overtime law because of certain commerce clause implications. April 15, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.

Nonflight personnel of interstate carriers who are not covered by valid existing collective bargaining agreements are not exempt from state law, and as to those individuals the provisions of state overtime law apply.
April 15, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.

Air carriers operating solely intrastate would not seem to fall under the exclusionary scope of either the Railway Labor Act, 45 U.S.C. §§ 151-188, or of the commerce clause absent unusual fact situations. Accordingly, the protections of AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

dealing with overtime extend to those individuals.
April 15, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.

An administrative regulation which would require an employer to include underground travel time as part of the “workweek” for calculating wages and overtime under this section might raise the issue of federal preemption but would survive such a challenge, since Congress did not intend to preclude state regulation and there is no actual conflict between such a regulation and federal law. February 22, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.10.065.
Minimum wages.

Except as otherwise provided for in law, an employer shall pay to each employee a minimum wage, as established herein, for hours worked in a pay period, whether the work is measured by time, piece, commission or otherwise. An employer may not apply tips or gratuities bestowed upon employees as a credit toward payment of the minimum hourly wage required by this section. Tip credit as defined by the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 as amended does not apply to the minimum wage established by this section. Beginning February 24, 2015, the minimum wage shall be $8.75 per hour effective January 1, 2015, $9.75 per hour effective January 1, 2016, and thereafter adjusted annually for inflation. The adjustment shall be calculated each September 30, for the proceeding January-December calendar year, by the Alaska Department of Labor and Workforce Development, using 100 percent of the rate of inflation based on the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the Anchorage metropolitan area, compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor; the department shall round the adjusted minimum hourly wage up to the nearest one cent; the adjusted minimum hourly wage shall apply to work performed beginning on January 1 through December 31 of the year for which it is effective.

Subject to the limitation under (c) of this section, an employer shall pay to each person employed as a public school bus driver wages at a rate of not less than two times the minimum wage established under (a) of this section, for hours worked in a pay period, whether work is measured by time, commission, or otherwise. An employer may not apply fringe benefits as a credit toward payment of the minimum wage established under this subsection.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, an employer who contracts with the Department of Education and Early Development, a school district, or a regional educational attendance area to provide school bus transportation services is not required to adjust school bus driver wages under (b) of this section, except when entering into or renewing the contract.

If the minimum wage determined under (a) of this section is less than one dollar over the federal minimum wage, the Alaska minimum wage shall be set at one dollar over the federal minimum wage. This amount shall be adjusted in subsequent years by the method established in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 171 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 2 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 1974; am §§ 3, 4 ch 12 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 110 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 148 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 2009; am §§ 3, 4, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 3)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in (c) of this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Subsection (a) was repealed and reenacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 3, and in 2015 a comma was added to conform the initiative to the style of the Alaska Statutes, and “Beginning February 24, 2015,” was substituted for “Beginning with the passage of this Act”.
Subsection (d) was enacted as section 4 of 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 3 and was codified in 2014 at which time “(a) of this section” was substituted for “Section 3” in two places.

Although, Ballot Measure No. 2 (Initiative 13-MINW), which was enacted at the 2014 general election and repealed and reenacted subsection (a) and enacted subsection (d), provides that an increase in the minimum wage is to take effect January 1, 2015, the Ballot Measure itself did not take effect until February 24, 2015.

Cross references. —

For the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, see 29 U.S.C. 201-219.

Administrative Code. —

For minimum wages and overtime, see 8 AAC 15, art. 2.

For reduction of wages, see 8 AAC 15, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 24, 2009, repealed and reenacted subsection (a), which read, “Except as provided under (b) of this section and as otherwise provided for in law, for work performed on or after January 1, 2003, an employer shall pay to each employee wages at a rate of not less than $7.15 an hour for hours worked in a pay period, whether the work is measured by time, piece, commission, or otherwise. An employer may not apply tips or gratuities bestowed upon employees as a credit toward payment of the minimum hourly wage required by this section. Tip credit as defined by the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 as amended does not apply to the minimum wage established by this section.”

The 2014 amendment, effective February 24, 2015, rewrote (a), which read, “Except as provided in (b) of this section and as otherwise provided by law, for hours worked in a pay period, whether the work is measured by time, piece, commission, or otherwise, an employer shall pay to each employee wages at a rate that is not less than $7.25 an hour until December 31, 2009, and thereafter not less than 50 cents an hour more than the federal minimum wage. An employer may not apply tips or gratuities bestowed on employees as a credit toward payment of the minimum hourly wage required by this section. Tip credit as defined by the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, does not apply to the minimum wage established by this section.”

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 3, was enacted by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions take effect February 24, 2015.

For findings and declaration and purpose for subsections (a) and (d), see secs. 1 and 2 of 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 3.

Sec. 23.10.070.
Exemptions from minimum wage.

To the extent necessary to prevent curtailment of opportunities of employment, the commissioner may by regulations or orders provide for the employment at wages lower than the minimum wage prescribed in AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

of

an individual whose earning capacity is impaired by physical or mental deficiency, age, or injury, at the wages and subject to the restrictions and for the period of time that are fixed by the commissioner; and

an apprentice at the wages that are approved by the commissioner; or

a learner at the wages and subject to the restrictions and for the periods of time that are fixed by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 5 ch 171 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 2 SLA 1962)

Administrative Code. —

For exemptions, see 8 AAC 15, art. 3.

Sec. 23.10.071.
Wages for work therapy.

For work therapy, as defined in AS

47.37.270

, a participant in a residential drug abuse or alcoholism treatment program designed to extend more than 120 days may be paid less than the minimum wage prescribed in AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

if the rate has been approved by the commissioner under this section and is in compliance with federal law.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations regarding the payment of wages for work therapy. In adopting the regulations, the commissioner shall consider whether the work performed by the patient

is solely for the benefit of the patient and is that which is ordinarily carried on by patients in a residential treatment program;

would ordinarily be performed by full-time employees of the program;

is work that may produce income to the patient, other than wages;

produces goods or services the proceeds of which will economically or otherwise benefit the owners, operators, or businesses of the rehabilitation program; and

creates an unfair competition with private enterprise because of lower wage standards.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1983)

Sec. 23.10.075.
Labor standards and safety division.

There is established in the department the division of labor standards and safety.
The director of the division is responsible to the commissioner. The director shall administer AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

and AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

.

History.

(§ 6(1) ch 171 SLA 1959; am E.O. No. 52, § 4 (1982))

Sec. 23.10.080.
Powers and duties of division.

The director, or an authorized representative of the director, shall

investigate and ascertain the wages and related conditions and standards of employment of any employee in the state;

enter the place of business or employment of an employer at reasonable times for the purpose of inspecting payroll records that relate to the question of wages paid or hours worked;

require and subpoena from an employer a statement in writing, when the director or the representative considers it necessary, of hours worked by and the wages paid to a person in the employ of the employer, and the commissioner may require the employer to make the statement under oath;

question an employee in a place of employment during work hours with respect to the wages paid and the hours worked by the employees;

compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, and documents by subpoena when necessary for the purpose of a hearing or investigation provided for in AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

.

History.

(§ 6(2) ch 171 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures relating to violations, investigations, or hearings, see 8 AAC 15, art. 5.

Sec. 23.10.085.
Scope of administrative regulations; room and board deductions.

The director may adopt, amend, or rescind administrative regulations not inconsistent with the purposes and provisions of AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

that are necessary for the administration of AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

.

The regulations may, without limiting the generality of (a) of this section, define terms used in AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

, and restrict or prohibit industrial homework or other acts or practices that the director finds appropriate to carry out the purpose of AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

, or to prevent the circumvention or evasion of AS 23.10.050 — 23.10.150.

The regulations may permit deductions by an employer from the minimum wage applicable under AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

to employees for the reasonable cost, as determined by the director on an occupation basis, of furnishing board or lodging if board or lodging is customarily furnished by the employer and used by the employee.

History.

(§ 6(3) ch 171 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 90 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For minimum wages and overtime, see 8 AAC 15, art. 2.

For exemptions, see 8 AAC 15, art. 3.

For reduction of wages, see 8 AAC 15, art. 4.

For procedures relating to violations, investigations, or hearings, see 8 AAC 15, art. 5.

Sec. 23.10.090.
Administrative procedures.

Regulations adopted or hearings conducted under AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

shall be adopted or conducted and be subject to judicial review in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 6(4) ch 171 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures relating to violations, investigations, or hearings, see 8 AAC 15, art. 5.

Sec. 23.10.095.
Adoption of federal regulations.

The commissioner may adopt regulations and interpretations that are made by the administrator of the Wage and Hour Division of the federal Department of Labor and that are not inconsistent with AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

.

History.

(§ 6(5) ch 171 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For minimum wages and overtime, see 8 AAC 15, art. 2.

For reduction of wages, see 8 AAC 15, art. 4.

Sec. 23.10.100.
Employer to keep records.

An employer shall keep for a period of at least three years at the place where an employee is employed a record of the name, address, and occupation of each employee, the rate of pay and the amount paid each pay period to each employee, the hours worked each day and each workweek by each employee, and other payroll information that the commissioner may require.

The commissioner or an authorized representative of the commissioner may copy the employer’s records at any reasonable time. An employer shall furnish to the commissioner or the representative on demand a sworn statement of the employer’s records, and the commissioner may require that the sworn statement be made upon forms the commissioner has prescribed or approved.

History.

(§ 7 ch 171 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For minimum wages and overtime, see 8 AAC 15, art. 2.

Sec. 23.10.105.
Posting summary required.

An employer subject to AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

shall keep a summary or abstract of these sections, approved by the commissioner, posted in a conspicuous location at the place where a person subject to them is employed.
An employer shall be furnished copies of a summary by the state on request without charge.

History.

(§ 8 ch 171 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.10.110.
Remedies of employee; attorney fees; offers of judgment; settlement; waiver.

An employer who violates a provision of AS

23.10.060

or

23.10.065

is liable to an employee affected in the amount of unpaid minimum wages, or unpaid overtime compensation, as the case may be, and, except as provided in (d) of this section, in an additional equal amount as liquidated damages.

An action to recover from the employer the wages and damages for which the employer is liable may be maintained in a competent court by an employee personally and for other employees similarly situated, or an employee may individually designate in writing an agent or representative to maintain an action for the employee. The consent shall be filed in the court in which the action is brought. At the request of a person paid less than the amount to which the person is entitled under AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

, the commissioner may take an assignment in trust for the employee of the full amount to which the employee is entitled under this section and may bring any legal action necessary to collect the claim.

The court in an action brought under this section shall, in addition to a judgment awarded to the plaintiff, allow costs of the action and, except as provided in (e) — (h) of this section, reasonable attorney fees to be paid by the defendant. The attorney fees in the case of actions brought under this section by the commissioner shall be remitted by the commissioner to the Department of Revenue. The commissioner may not be required to pay the filing fee or other costs. The commissioner in case of suit has power to join various claimants against the same employer in one cause of action.

In an action under (a) of this section to recover unpaid overtime compensation or liquidated damages for unpaid overtime, if the defendant shows by clear and convincing evidence that the act or omission giving rise to the action was made in good faith and that the employer had reasonable grounds for believing that the act or omission was not in violation of AS

23.10.060

, the court may decline to award liquidated damages or may award an amount of liquidated damages less than the amount set out in (a) of this section.

If the plaintiff prevails in an action for unpaid overtime compensation under (a) of this section, the court shall award reasonable attorney fees to the plaintiff unless the defendant shows by clear and convincing evidence that the act or omission giving rise to the action was made in good faith and that the defendant had reasonable grounds for believing that the act or omission was not in violation of AS

23.10.060

, in which case

the court may award attorney fees to the plaintiff in accordance with court rules; or

if the defendant would be entitled to attorney fees if the action were subject to the standards under court rule offers of judgment, the court may not award attorney fees to either the plaintiff or the defendant.

If the defendant prevails in an action for unpaid overtime compensation under (a) of this section and had previously made an offer of judgment to the plaintiff, the court shall award attorney fees to the defendant unless the plaintiff proves to the satisfaction of the court that the action was both brought and prosecuted in good faith and that the plaintiff had reasonable grounds for believing that the act or omission was in violation of AS

23.10.060

. If the court awards attorney fees to the defendant, the award shall be made in accordance with court rule.

Failure to inquire into Alaska law is not consistent with a claim of good faith under this section.

Subsections (d) — (g) of this section do not apply to an action brought under this section by the commissioner.

The commissioner may supervise the payment of the unpaid overtime compensation owing to an employee under AS

23.10.060

. Payment in full in accordance with an agreement by an employee to settle a claim for unpaid overtime compensation or liquidated damages for unpaid overtime compensation constitutes a waiver of any right as to this claim the employee may have under (a) of this section to unpaid overtime compensation or liquidated damages for unpaid overtime compensation.

In a settlement for unpaid overtime compensation that is not supervised by the department or the court, an employee is entitled to liquidated damages under (a) of this section unless the employee and the employer enter into a written settlement agreement in which the employee expressly waives the right to receive liquidated damages. A private written settlement agreement under this subsection is not valid unless submitted to the department for review. The department shall review the agreement and approve it if it is fair to the parties. The department shall approve or deny an agreement within 30 days of receipt. A waiver of liquidated damages may not be a condition of employment.

History.

(§ 9(3) ch 171 SLA 1959; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 37 SLA 1995; am § 22 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures relating to violations, investigations, or hearings, see 8 AAC 15, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, substituted “this section” for “this subsection” at the end of (g).

Sec. 23.10.115.
Enforcement by injunction.

If it appears to the commissioner that an employer is engaged in an act or practice that violates or will violate a provision of AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

or of a regulation adopted under these sections, the commissioner may bring an action in a competent court to enjoin the act or practice, and to enforce compliance with AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

or with the regulation.
Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction or restraining order shall be granted without bond.

History.

(§ 9(4) ch 171 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.10.120.
Enforcement of subpoenas.

If a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued under AS

23.10.080

, or if a witness refuses to produce evidence or to testify to a matter regarding which the witness may be lawfully interrogated, a competent court shall, upon application of the commissioner or an authorized representative, compel obedience by proceedings for contempt, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued by the court or a refusal to testify before it.

History.

(§ 9(5) ch 171 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.10.125.
Collective bargaining.

AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

do not limit the right of employees to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing to establish wages or conditions of work in excess of the applicable minimum under AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

or to establish hours of work shorter than the applicable maximum under AS 23.10.050 — 23.10.150.

History.

(§ 10 ch 171 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.10.130.
Statute of limitations.

An action for unpaid minimum wages, unpaid overtime compensation, or liquidated damages under AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

is forever barred unless it is started within two years after the cause of action accrues. For the purposes of this section an action is considered to be started on the date when the complaint is filed.

History.

(§§ 11, 12 ch 171 SLA 1959; am § 57 ch 59 SLA 1982)